Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1305
Director of Personnel; compensation.

The compensation of the Director of Personnel shall be fixed by the Director of Administrative Services.

Laws 1967, c. 573, § 5, p. 1890;

Laws 1971, LB 1030, § 4;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 13.